task2.foma
define vowel a | e | i | o | u | y ;
define consonant b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | x | z | w ;

define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;
define CYReplacement y -> i e || consonant _ "^" s ;
define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

define Exceptions [{goose} "+N" "+Pl" .x. {geese}] ;
read lexc words2.lexc 
define Lexicon ;

regex Exceptions .P. 
      Lexicon .o.
      EInsertion .o.
      CYReplacement .o.
      Cleanup ;
